District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.17a

Public place defined.

For the purposes of § 47-2885.17, the term “public place” means any street, sidewalk, bridge, alley, plaza, park, driveway, parking lot, transportation facility, or the doorways and entrance ways to any building which fronts on any of these locations, or a motor vehicle in or on any such place.

Dec. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 4-57, § 2(2), 28 DCR 4652
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-2017.1.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
The phrase “§ 47-2885.17” was substituted for “this act” near the beginning of this section for clarity. The act referred to was D.C. Law 4-57.